Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.290

ESD superintendent's powers and duties—Oaths and affirmations.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, each educational service district superintendent shall:

(1) Administer oaths and affirmations to school directors, teachers, and other persons on official matters connected with or relating to schools, when appropriate, but not make or collect any charge or fee for so doing.

(2) Require the oath of office of all school district officers be filed as provided in *RCW 28A.315.500 and furnish a directory of all such officers to the county auditor and to the county treasurer of the county in which the school district is located as soon as such information can be obtained after the election or appointment of such officers is determined and their oaths placed on file.

[ 1990 c 33 s 282; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 26; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.21.112.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.500 was recodified as RCW 28A.343.360 pursuant to 1999 c 315 s 804.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.